test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njuovca_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - njuovčâ: # 2A
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuovčâ
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuohčâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuohčâm
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuohčâmân
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuohčâmist
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Com: njuohčâmáin
    njuovčâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuohčâmttáá
    njuovčâ+N+Ess: njuovčân                     #njuohčâmin
    njuovčâ+N+Par: njuovčâd                     #njuohčâmid
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuohčâmeh
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Gen: njuohčâmij
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuohčâmijd
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuohčâmáid
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuohčâmijn
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Com: njuohčâmijguin
    njuovčâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuohčâmijttáá
